Massachusetts, session 194th, S77.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 94G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following 2 definitions:-
"Labor peace agreement", an agreement between a marijuana establishment and a bona
fide labor organization that protects the parties' interests by, at minimum, allowing union agents
to inform and communicate with employees about their labor rights including, but not limited to,
the right to form a union without interference from the employer in exchange for prohibiting the
labor organization from engaging in picketing, work stoppages or boycotts against the marijuana
establishment.
of 4

“Bona fide labor organization” means an organization that is included on the list
established and periodically updated by the commission pursuant to section 23, as amended by
this act.
SECTION 2. Paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of section 5 of said chapter 94G, as so
appearing, is hereby amended by striking out the word “and” in line 29.
SECTION 3. Paragraph (4) of said subsection (b) is hereby amended by replacing the
period in line 36 with a semi-colon followed by the word “and.”
SECTION 4. Said subsection (b) is further amended by adding the following paragraph: -
(5) the prospective marijuana establishment has submitted an attestation that the applicant
shall not interfere with union agents informing and communicating with employees about their
labor rights including, but not limited to, the right to form a union without interference from the
employer; provided however, that this requirement may be satisfied by the submission of an
attestation, signed by both the applicant and a labor organization, stating that the applicant has
entered into, and will maintain and abide by the terms of, a labor peace agreement.
SECTION 5. Subsection (b) of section 6 of said chapter 94G is hereby amended by
adding the following paragraph:-
As part of a marijuana establishment’s renewal application, a marijuana establishment
shall submit an attestation stating that the marijuana establishment has not interfered, and will
not interfere, with its employees’ ability to form and maintain a union, including the ability for
union agents to inform and communicate with employees about their labor rights including, but
not limited to, the right to form a union without interference from the employer; provided
of 4

however, that this requirement may be satisfied by the submission of an attestation signed by the
license holder and a labor organization stating that the license holder has entered into,
maintained, and abided by the terms of a labor peace agreement.
SECTION 6. Chapter 94G is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the
following new section:-
Section 23. (a) The commission shall establish and periodically update a list of bona fide
labor organizations that are actively seeking employees in the commonwealth.
(b) The commission may include on its list labor organizations of any kind, including an
employee representation committee, group, or association, in which employees participate and
which exists and is constituted for the purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining or
otherwise dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, terms or conditions of
employment, including wages and rates of pay, or other mutual aid or protection in connection
with employment. Such labor organizations may be characterized by the following:
(1) Being a party to 1 or more executed collective bargaining agreements with medical or
adult-use marijuana employers, in the commonwealth or another state.
(2) Having a written constitution or bylaws in the 3 immediately preceding years.
(3) Filing the annual financial report required of labor organizations under subsection (b)
of 29 U.S.C. § 431 or having at least 1 audited financial report in the 3 immediately preceding
years.
(4) Being affiliated with any regional or national association of unions, including state
and federal labor councils.
of 4

(5) Being a member of a national labor organization that has at least 500 general
members in a majority of the 50 states of the United States.
(6) Being free from domination, interference, or financial support by any employer.
(c) The cannabis control commission shall promulgate regulations to implement this
chapter and in doing so shall consult with the executive office of labor and workforce
development.
(d) This section shall not apply to Small Businesses, as defined in 935 CMR 500.02 and
935 CMR 501.02.
of 4